District of Columbia statutes.
1-501

Oath to be taken by officers.

All civil officers in the District shall, before they act as such, respectively take and subscribe an oath or affirmation to support the Constitution of the United States, and faithfully to discharge the duties of their respective offices; and the oath or affirmation provided for by this section shall be taken and subscribed, certified, and recorded, in such manner and form as may be prescribed by law.

R.S., D.C., § 85
June 20, 1874, 18 Stat. 116, ch. 337, § 2
June 11, 1878, 20 Stat. 103, ch. 180, § 2
1981 Ed., § 1-501.
1973 Ed., § 1-308.
Establishment of District of Columbia Board of Appeals and Review: See Mayor’s Order 96-27, March 5, 1996 ( 43 DCR 1367).